Nebraska, session 109, LB88.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB88 LB88
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $500,000 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $500,000 from the General Fund for
FY2026-27 to the Department of Economic Development for state aid.
There is included in the appropriation in this section $500,000 from
the General Fund for FY2025-26 and $500,000 from the General Fund for
FY2026-27 as state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $500,000 from the
General Fund annually to the Department of Economic Development to
contract to provide for educational programming and technical expertise
related to downtown or mainstreet revitalization, business growth, and
historic preservation to communities throughout the state. The
appropriation shall only be used for such purpose.
-2-